Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVII Special Proceedings
CHAPTER 418 Summary Proceedings — Declaratory Judgments

418.005.
Judgment
may be obtained on motion.

A judgment may be obtained,
on motion, by a surety against his principal or cosurety for money paid; by
a client against his attorney for money collected or property received; by
a party or officer against a surety for costs; and by a party against an officer
for money collected or property received, and for the damages which such party
is entitled to recover; and in all other cases specially authorized by statute;
and the service of the notice shall be regarded as the commencement of the
proceeding.

History.

C.C. 444: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

418.010.
Service
and form of notice.

Notice of such motion shall be served on the party against whom judgment is sought, at least ten (10) days before the motion is made. The motion and notice thereof shall be served by an officer authorized to serve a summons, and the service and return shall be made in the manner prescribed for service of summons by the Rules of Civil Procedure.

The notice shall state the nature and grounds of the motion, and the day on which it will be made.

History.

C.C. 445, 446: trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 18, effective July 1, 1953.

418.015.
No
written pleadings required — Judgment.

The motion may be heard and
determined upon or without written pleadings, and judgment shall be given
according to law and the rules of equity.

History.

C. C. 449: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

418.020.
Agreed
case may be submitted to court — Affidavit — Proceedings.

Parties to a question which
might be the subject of a civil action may, without action, state the question
and the facts upon which it depends, and present a submission thereof to any
court which would have jurisdiction if an action had been brought. But it
must appear by affidavit that the controversy is real, and the proceedings
in good faith, to determine the rights of the parties. The court shall, thereupon,
hear and determine the case, and render judgment as if an action were pending.

History.

C. C. 637: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

418.025.
Record.

The case, the submission and
the judgment shall constitute the record.

History.

C. C. 638: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

418.030.
Judgment
— Appeal.

The judgment shall be with costs,
and may be enforced, and shall be subject to reversal, in the same manner
as if it had been rendered in an action, unless otherwise provided in the
submission.

History.

C. C. 639: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

418.040.
Plaintiff
may obtain declaration of rights if actual controversy exists.

In any action in a court of
record of this Commonwealth having general jurisdiction wherein it is made
to appear that an actual controversy exists, the plaintiff may ask for a declaration
of rights, either alone or with other relief; and the court may make a binding
declaration of rights, whether or not consequential relief is or could be
asked.

History.

C. C. 639a-1: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 1; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

418.045.
Persons
who may obtain declaration of rights — Enumeration not exclusive.

Any person interested under
a deed, will or other instrument of writing, or in a contract, written or
parol; or whose rights are affected by statute, municipal ordinance, or other
government regulation; or who is concerned with any title to property, office,
status or relation; or who as fiduciary, or beneficiary is interested in any
estate, provided always that an actual controversy exists with respect thereto,
may apply for and secure a declaration of his right or duties, even though
no consequential or other relief be asked. The enumeration herein contained
does not exclude other instances wherein a declaratory judgment may be prayed
and granted under KRS

418.040

, whether such other instance be of a similar
or different character to those so enumerated.

History.

C. C. 639a-2: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 2; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

418.050.
Action
for declaration to be heard as motion.

Any action in which a declaration
of rights or determination of questions of construction is the relief asked,
may be docketed for early hearing as in the case of a motion.

History.

C. C. 639a-3: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 3; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 272.

418.055.
Further
relief based on declaratory judgment.

Further relief, based on a declaratory
judgment, order or decree, may be granted whenever necessary or proper. The
application therefor shall be by petition to a court having jurisdiction to
grant the relief, either in the same proceeding wherein the declaratory judgment,
order or decree, was entered, or, in an independent action. If the application
be deemed sufficient, the court shall, on reasonable notice, require any adverse
party whose rights have been adjudicated by the declaratory judgment, order
or decree, to show cause why further relief should not be granted forthwith.

History.

C. C. 639a-4: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 4; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

418.060.
Appeals.

Any party aggrieved by a declaratory
judgment, order or decree, rendered in the Circuit Court, may take and perfect
an appeal to the Court of Appeals in the manner provided in the Rules of Civil
Procedure for appeals.

History.

C.C. 639a-5: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 5; trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 22; 1976, ch. 62, § 124.

418.065.
When
court may refuse to declare rights — Scope of review — Remand of
case by appellate court.

The court may refuse to exercise
the power to declare rights, duties or other legal relations in any case where
a decision under it would not terminate the uncertainty or controversy which
gave rise to the action, or in any case where the declaration or construction
is not necessary or proper at the time under all the circumstances. The appellate
court in its consideration of the case, shall not be confined to errors alleged
or apparent in the record. When, in its opinion, further pleadings or proof
is necessary to a final and correct decision of the matters involved, or that
should be involved, it shall remand the case for that purpose; or if in its
opinion the action is prematurely brought, or where a ruling in the appellate
court is not considered necessary or proper at the time under all the circumstances,
it may direct a dismissal without prejudice in the lower court.

History.

C. C. 639a-6: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 6; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

418.070.
Costs.

The parties to a proceeding
to obtain a declaratory judgment, order or decree, may stipulate with reference
to the allowance of costs and in the absence of such stipulation the court
may make such award of costs as may seem equitable and just.

History.

C. C. 639a-8: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 8; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

418.075.
Necessary parties — Notice to Attorney General in proceedings and appeals — Notice to Legislative Research Commission — Consent to suit required for certain actions involving legislative branch.

When declaratory relief is sought,
all persons shall be made parties who have or claim any interest which would
be affected by the declaration, and no declaration shall prejudice the rights
of persons not parties to the proceeding.

In any proceeding which involves the validity of a statute, the Attorney General of the state shall, before judgment is entered, be served with a copy of the petition, and shall be entitled to be heard, and if the ordinance or franchise is alleged to be unconstitutional, the Attorney General of the state shall also be served with a copy of the petition and be entitled to be heard.

In any appeal to the Kentucky Court of Appeals or Supreme Court or the federal appellate courts in any forum which involves the constitutional validity of a statute, the Attorney General shall, before the filing of the appellant’s brief, be served with a copy of the pleading, paper, or other documents which initiate the appeal in the appellate forum. This notice shall specify the challenged statute and the nature of the alleged constitutional defect.

The Attorney General shall notify the Legislative Research Commission of:

The receipt of a petition and the nature of any proceedings involving the validity of a statute; and

The entering of a final judgment in those proceedings, if the Attorney General is a party to that action.

Pursuant to Sections 43 and 231 of the Constitution of Kentucky, members of the General Assembly, organizations within the legislative branch of state government, or officers or employees of the legislative branch shall not be made parties to any action challenging the constitutionality or validity of any statute or regulation, without the consent of the member, organization, or officer or employee.

History.

C. C. 639a-9: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 9; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1996, ch. 202, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2003, ch. 152, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

418.080.
Remedial
purpose — Construction.

KRS

418.040

to

418.090

is declared
to be remedial; their purpose is to make courts more serviceable to the people
by way of settling controversies, and affording relief from uncertainty and
insecurity with respect to rights, duties and relations, and are to be liberally
interpreted and administered.

History.

C. C. 639a-10: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 10; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

418.085.
Definition of “person.”

The word “person”
wherever used in KRS

418.040

to

418.090

, shall be construed to mean any person,
partnership, joint stock company, incorporated association, or society, or
municipal or other corporation of any character whatsoever.

History.

C. C. 639a-11: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 11; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

418.090.
Repealer — Effect
of partial invalidity.

All statutes, or laws in conflict
or inconsistent with the provisions of KRS

418.040

to

418.090

, are hereby
repealed. It is intended that KRS

418.040

to

418.090

shall be valid to the
fullest extent possible; and that the invalidity, if any, of any part or feature
thereof, shall not affect or render the remainder of KRS 418.040 to 418.090
invalid, or inoperative.

History.

C. C. 639a-12: amend. Acts 1922, ch. 83, § 12; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.